Washington statutes.
RCW 13.24.050

Fees.

Any judge of this state who appoints counsel or guardian ad litem pursuant to the provision of the compact may, in his or her discretion, fix a fee to be paid out of funds available for disposition by the court but no such fee shall exceed twenty-five dollars.

[ 2010 c 8 s 4005; 1955 c 284 s 5.]